Hawaii statutes.
§444-9.3 Aiding or abetting. Aiding or
abetting an unlicensed person to evade this chapter or knowingly combining or
conspiring with an unlicensed person, or allowing one's license to be used by
an unlicensed person, or acting as agent or partner or associate, or otherwise,
of an unlicensed person, with the intent to evade this chapter, shall be a
misdemeanor and may subject the licensee to additional discipline by the board.
[L 1974, c 112, pt of §1(1); am L 2014, c 29, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next